California, session 20252026, AB1284.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 8586.10 is added to the Government Code, to read:8586.10. (a) (1) The Office of Emergency Services shall develop state recovery frameworks for California’s catastrophic plans.(2) The governing body of a political subdivision shall develop regional recovery frameworks for California’s catastrophic plans. The Office of Emergency Services shall provide technical assistance in the development of regional recovery frameworks.(b) In developing recovery frameworks, the Office of Emergency Services and the governing bodies of political subdivisions shall incorporate lessons learned from recent major disasters. The recovery frameworks shall be consistent with guidance from the Federal Emergency Management Agency and shall address, at a minimum, the following recovery support functions that comprise the coordinating structure for key functional areas of assistance in the National Disaster Recovery Framework:(1) Economic recovery. This support function focuses on the ability to return economic and business activities (including agricultural) to a state of health and develop new economic opportunities that result in a sustainable and economically viable community.(2) Health and social services. This support function recognizes health care is an economic driver in many communities, which if damaged makes this sector critical to most communities’ disaster recovery. Social services have a major impact on the ability of a community to recover. The support of social services programs for at-risk and vulnerable children, individuals, and families affected by a disaster can promote a more effective and rapid recovery.(3) Infrastructure systems. This support function works to efficiently facilitate the restoration of infrastructure systems and services to support a viable, sustainable community and improves resilience to, and protection from, future hazards.(4) Housing. This support function coordinates and facilitates the delivery of government resources to implement housing solutions that effectively support the needs of the whole community and contribute to its sustainability and resilience. Housing is a critical and often challenging component of disaster recovery, but must be adequate, affordable, and accessible to make a difference for the whole community.(5) Community planning and capacity building recovery. This support function strives to restore and strengthen state, territorial, tribal, and local governments’ ability to plan for recovery, engage the community in the recovery planning process, and build capacity for local plan implementation and recovery management. Recovery planning in the postdisaster environment builds short- and long-term community resilience, empowers local leaders and stakeholders, and improves recovery outcomes for the individual and the community.(6) Natural and cultural resources. This support function facilitates the integration of capabilities of the government to support the protection of natural and cultural resources and historic properties through appropriate response and recovery actions to preserve, conserve, rehabilitate, and restore them consistent with postdisaster community priorities and in compliance with applicable environmental and historical preservation laws and executive orders.(c) State and regional recovery frameworks shall be completed by January 15, 2027.(d) The Office of Emergency Services shall, to the greatest extent possible, use federal preparedness grant funding to offset the state, local, and tribal government costs associated with developing the recovery frameworks described in this section.(e) For purposes of this section, “catastrophic plans” include the following disaster response plans developed by the Office of Emergency Services or the Federal Emergency Management Agency, or both:(1) Northern California Catastrophic Flood Response Plan. (2) Bay Area Earthquake Plan. (3) California Cascadia Subduction Zone Earthquake and Tsunami Response Plan. (4) Southern California Catastrophic Earthquake Plan. (5) Catastrophic Wildfires in the Wildland Urban Interface.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.SEC. 3. This act is an urgency statute necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect. The facts constituting the necessity are:In order to enhance California’s recovery planning to address the immediate threats to public health and safety caused by catastrophic wildfires, earthquakes, and floods, it is necessary for this act to take effect immediately.___________________ CORRECTIONS: Heading—Line 2.___________________